Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.160

Charging fee or payment contrary to chapter—Return of excess.

Any employment agency which collects, receives, or retains a fee or other payment contrary to the provisions of this chapter or to the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall return the excessive portion of the fee within seven days after receiving a demand therefor from the director.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 16.]